Massachusetts, session 194th, H4192.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 8C of chapter 40 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the conservation commission of the town of
Southwick shall consist of 7 members. Four members of the commission shall be appointed by
the town select board and 3 members of the commission shall be elected by the voters at the
annual town election. All members of the conservation commission shall reside in the town of
Southwick and be registered voters of the town therein.
(b) Each member of the commission shall serve for a 3-year term or until a member no
longer serves on the commission, as set forth in this act, whichever is earlier.
of 2

(c) Should any of the commissions, boards or authorities who or which have appointing
authority under this act be no longer in existence for whatever reason, that position that would
have been appointed shall thereafter be elected by the voters at the annual town election and shall
reside in the town of Southwick and be a registered voter in the town.
(d) The select board may remove any member of the commission for cause after a
hearing.
(e) Any vacancy occurring on the commission from any cause shall be filled for the
remainder of the unexpired term by the select board, such appointment shall be made not less
than 21 days following notice of such vacancy.
(f) Any vacancy occurring in 1 of the positions elected by the voters, pursuant to
subsection (a), shall be filled by an appointment by the town select board until the next annual
town election where the vacant position on the conservation commission shall be available on the
ballot and shall be filled by the election of the registered voters of the town of Southwick for the
balance of the unexpired term, if any, otherwise for the new term.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding subsection (b) of section 1 of this act, the initial terms of
the 3 members elected by the voters at the next annual town election shall be: (i) 1 person for a
1-year term; (ii) 1 person for a 2-year term; and (iii) 1 person for a 3-year term. Thereafter, these
members shall be elected for 3-year terms at the annual town election.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2